Missouri, session 2026, SB1230.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 192, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 192.2155, to read as
follows:
192.2155. 1. The division of senior and disability
services within the department of health and senior services
shall establish a dementia services coordinator as a full-
time position.
2. The dementia services coordinator shall:
(1) Evaluate the coordination of dementia services
within this state;
(2) Coordinate information resources affecting
Missourians living with dementia and their caregivers. Such
coordination shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Using dementia-related data to coordinate ways to
improve public health outcomes and service delivery for
persons with Alzheimer's disease or related dementia;
(b) Establishing and maintaining relationships with
other agencies, providers, and organizations within the
state in order to meet the needs of affected populations and
prevent the duplication of services;

SB 1230 2
(c) Supporting the provision of dementia-specific
staff training across all relevant state agencies, including
law enforcement, the department of health and senior
services, and other organizations; and
(d) Recommending strategies to improve coordination of
dementia-related services and resources provided by public
and private entities;
(3) Streamline all applicable state government
services to increase efficiency and improve the quality of
care in residential, home-based, and community-based
settings;
(4) Identify any duplicated services;
(5) Identify grant opportunities to expand the scope
of services for persons living with dementia and their
caregivers and apply for the grant opportunities;
(6) Complete other duties relevant to supporting
policy development and implementation to enhance the quality
of life for persons affected by dementia and their
caregivers;
(7) Promote public and professional awareness and
education of dementia and access to needed services and
programs; and
(8) Collect and monitor data concerning the impact of
dementia in Missouri.
✓